Nevada, session 2025Special36, SB9.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 4 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. In a county wherein the board of county
commissioners adopts an ordinance that designates the
geographic boundaries of one or more corridors pursuant to
section 6 of this act, a justice court may establish an appropriate
program for the adjudication of offenses punishable as a
misdemeanor that occurred within such corridors.
2. Under a program established pursuant to subsection 1, a
justice court may rescind an order prohibiting a person from
entering a corridor upon the successful completion by the person
of a diversion program for which participation is a condition of
release, sentencing, suspended sentence or deferred adjudication.
Sec. 3. 1. On or before July 1 of each year, a justice court
whose jurisdiction includes a corridor established pursuant to
-
*SB9*

– 3 –
section 6 of this act shall prepare and submit an annual report to
the Legislature.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the report
prepared and submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) The number of persons charged, convicted and sentenced
for any offense punishable as a misdemeanor in the corridor
during the immediately preceding year;
(b) The underlying crime for which such persons were
charged, convicted and sentenced in the corridor during the
immediately preceding year;
(c) The rate of successful completion of the sentence or
condition of release, which must be expressed as the percentage of
persons who successfully completed the sentence or condition of
release imposed by the court out of the total number of persons
sentenced by the court;
(d) The number of persons subject to an order prohibiting a
person from entering the geographic boundaries of a corridor
designated by ordinance in the immediately preceding year,
including, without limitation, whether the person has been
charged or convicted of a repeat offense within a corridor; and
(e) The information described in paragraphs (a) to (d),
inclusive, pertaining to any person who has been ordered,
assigned or sentenced to a diversion program.
3. Not later than the last day of each calendar month, a
justice court whose jurisdiction includes a corridor established
pursuant to section 6 of this act shall prepare and submit a
monthly report to the board of county commissioners.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the report
prepared and submitted pursuant to subsection 3 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Any information required to be submitted to the
Legislature pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) The total number of cases involving offenses punishable as
a misdemeanor that were committed within a corridor; and
(c) For each case reported pursuant to paragraph (b):
(1) The name of the presiding justice of the peace;
(2) The case number or other case identifier used by the
justice court for each case;
(3) Whether the person is a repeat offender for an offense
committed within the corridor; and
(4) If the person is a repeat offender for an offense
committed within a corridor:
(I) The duration of the time that has passed between the
commission of the offenses;
-
*SB9*

– 4 –
(II) The conditions of the sentences for the offenses;
and
(III) Whether the defendant was incarcerated for the
offenses.
5. Any report submitted pursuant to this section must not
include any identifying information of the:
(a) Person who was the subject of an order prohibiting the
person from entering a corridor; or
(b) Business or location where the underlying offense
occurred.
Sec. 4. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an entity licensed or certified pursuant to
chapter 449B of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Hospitality employee” means a person employed by a
resort hotel, resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention
center, including, without limitation, a person who is employed in
a position of front desk staff, housekeeping, concierge, valet, bell
service, gaming floor, food and beverage, retail, security, facility
or hotel administration, count room, management or any other
position that is responsible for ensuring a positive guest
experience, and whose employment duties require the employee to:
(1) Wear identification, clothing, a uniform or other
insignia that identifies the employee as working for a resort hotel,
resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention center; and
(2) Be physically present on the property of the resort hotel,
resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention center or
otherwise traveling within a corridor, as described in section 6 of
this act.
(e) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
[(e)] (f) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in
25 U.S.C. § 3602(4).
[(f)] (g) “Officer” means:
-
*SB9*

– 5 –
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney or public defender of an agency or
political subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe;
(8) A clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State;
(9) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
(11) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(12) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(g)] (h) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a genetic counselor, a
perfusionist, an anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant
-
*SB9*

– 6 –
licensed pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of
respiratory care, a homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner
of homeopathy, a homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a
physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a
physical therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a behavioral health and
wellness practitioner, a social worker, a marriage and family
therapist, a marriage and family therapist intern, a clinical
professional counselor, a clinical professional counselor intern, a
behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a registered behavior
technician, a mental health technician, a licensed dietitian, the
holder of a license or a limited license issued under the provisions of
chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health care facility,
an emergency medical responder, an emergency medical technician,
an advanced emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a
participant in a program of training to provide emergency medical
services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
[(h)] (i) “Resort hotel” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 463.01865.
(j) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
[(i)] (k) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(j)] (l) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(k)] (m) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
-
*SB9*

– 7 –
[(l)] (n) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(m)] (o) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
[(n)] (p) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a hospitality employee, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator or a utility worker who is
performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a hospitality employee, a provider of health
care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility
worker or a sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
-
*SB9*

– 8 –
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a hospitality employee, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator or a utility worker who is
performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a hospitality
employee, a provider of health care, a school employee, a taxicab
driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 5. NRS 200.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.481 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” means any willful and unlawful use of force or
violence upon the person of another.
(b) “Child” means a person less than 18 years of age.
(c) “Hospitality employee” means a person employed by a
resort hotel, resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention
center, including, without limitation, a person who is employed in
a position of front desk staff, housekeeping, concierge, valet, bell
service, gaming floor, food and beverage, retail, security, facility
or hotel administration, count room, management or any other
position that is responsible for ensuring a positive guest
experience, and whose employment duties require the employee to:
(1) Wear identification, clothing, a uniform or other
insignia that identifies the employee as working for a resort hotel,
resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention center; and
(2) Be physically present on the property of the resort hotel,
resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention center or
otherwise traveling within a corridor, as described in section 6 of
this act.
(d) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
[(d)] (e) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(3).
-
*SB9*

– 9 –
[(e)] (f) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in
25 U.S.C. § 3602(4).
[(f)] (g) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard, matron or other correctional officer of a
city or county jail or detention facility;
(5) A prosecuting attorney or public defender of an agency or
political subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including,
without limitation, a person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed
in this subparagraph;
(7) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe;
(8) A clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State;
(9) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
(11) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(12) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
-
*SB9*

– 10 –
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(g)] (h) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 200.471.
[(h)] (i) “Resort hotel” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 463.01865.
(j) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
[(i)] (k) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(j)] (l) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(k)] (m) “Strangulation” means intentionally applying
sufficient pressure to another person to make it difficult or
impossible for the person to breathe, including, without limitation,
applying pressure to the neck, throat or windpipe that may prevent
or hinder breathing or reduce the intake of air, or applying any
pressure to the neck on either side of the windpipe, but not the
windpipe itself, to stop the flow of blood to the brain via the carotid
arteries.
[(l)] (n) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
[(m)] (o) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(n)] (p) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
[(o)] (q) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 200.485, a person
convicted of a battery, other than a battery committed by an adult
upon a child which constitutes child abuse, shall be punished:
(a) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and no
substantial bodily harm to the victim results, except under
circumstances where a greater penalty is provided in this section or
NRS 197.090, for a misdemeanor.
(b) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and
either substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the battery is
-
*SB9*

– 11 –
committed by strangulation, for a category C felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) If:
(1) The battery is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a hospitality employee, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator or utility worker who was performing
his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event;
(2) The officer, a hospitality employee, provider of health
care, school employee, taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker
or sports official suffers substantial bodily harm or the battery is
committed by strangulation; and
(3) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a hospitality employee, provider of health
care, school employee, taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker
or sports official,
 for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the battery:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a hospitality employee, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator or utility worker who is performing
his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a hospitality employee, provider of health
care, school employee, taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker
or sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, except under circumstances where a
greater penalty is provided in this section.
(e) If the battery is committed with the use of a deadly weapon,
and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
-
*SB9*

– 12 –
more than 10 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(f) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, without the use of
a deadly weapon, whether or not substantial bodily harm results and
whether or not the battery is committed by strangulation, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years.
(g) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, with the use of a
deadly weapon, and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years.
Sec. 6. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, the
board of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance that
designates the geographic boundaries of one or more corridors in
which the commission of crime poses a significant risk to public
safety and the economic welfare of this State due to the high
concentration of tourists, visitors, employees and other persons in
such corridors.
2. The boundaries of a corridor established pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) May be contiguous or noncontiguous.
(b) Must be displayed on a map in a manner capable of being
understood by a person of ordinary intelligence and posted on the
Internet website of the county in which the corridor is established.
3. In a county that establishes a corridor pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), a person
who is charged with, convicted of or the subject of deferred
adjudication for any offense punishable as a misdemeanor:
-
*SB9*

– 13 –
(1) For a first offense within the corridor within 2 years,
may, as a condition of release, sentencing, suspension of sentence
or deferred adjudication, as applicable, be prohibited from
entering the corridor in which the offense occurred for a period of
not more than 1 year.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense within the corridor
within 2 years, shall, as a condition of release, sentencing,
suspension of sentence or deferred adjudication, as applicable, be
prohibited from entering the corridor in which the offense
occurred for a period of not less than 1 year.
(b) The board of county commissioners may provide by
ordinance for any condition or exemption under which a person
who is charged with, convicted of or the subject of adjudication for
any offense punishable as a misdemeanor may enter the corridor
in which the offense occurred.
Sec. 7. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 8. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 9. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
H
-
*SB9*